Missouri, session 2026, HB2874.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 407.324, to read as follows:
407.324. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Air ambulance membership agreement", an agreement in exchange for
consideration to pay for, indemnify, or provide an amount to a person for the cost of air
ambulance services. The term "air ambulance membership agreement" shall not
include a health insurance plan or policy regulated under chapter 376;
(2) "Air ambulance membership organization", an individual or entity that
provides an air ambulance membership agreement.
2. (1) An air ambulance membership organization shall not knowingly sell, offer
for sale, or renew an air ambulance membership agreement to an individual who is
enrolled in MO HealthNet.
(2) If an individual who has purchased an air ambulance membership
agreement subsequently enrolls in MO HealthNet during the duration of the
membership agreement, the enrollee may notify the air ambulance membership
organization of such enrollment. If the enrollee notifies the air ambulance membership
organization of such enrollment within thirty days following the effective date of the
enrollment, the enrollee may request, and upon such request the air ambulance
membership organization shall provide, either a prorated refund of any consideration
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2874 2
paid for the period from the effective date of the MO HealthNet enrollment through the
expiration date of the air ambulance membership agreement or a transfer of the
membership to another individual in the enrollee's household. If the enrollee does not
notify the air ambulance membership organization of such enrollment within thirty
days, the enrollee is not entitled to a prorated refund, but the air ambulance
membership organization shall still disenroll the enrollee within thirty days of receipt of
the notice of the enrollee's enrollment in MO HealthNet unless the enrollee's
membership is transferred to another individual in the enrollee's household.
3. All air ambulance membership agreement websites, brochures, and marketing
material shall include the following disclosures in a clear and conspicuous place:
(1) The air ambulance membership agreement is a membership plan and is not
insurance coverage;
(2) Medicaid enrollees are not eligible to purchase this membership; and
(3) Some state laws prohibit Medicaid beneficiaries from being offered air
ambulance memberships or being accepted into air ambulance membership programs.
4. An air ambulance membership agreement application shall include the
following disclosures in a clear and conspicuous place:
(1) The air ambulance membership agreement is a membership plan and is not
insurance coverage;
(2) Medicaid enrollees are not eligible to purchase this membership; and
(3) Some state laws prohibit Medicaid beneficiaries from being offered air
ambulance memberships or being accepted into air ambulance membership programs.
5. If an enrollee believes that an individual or entity has violated the provisions
of this section, the enrollee may file a complaint with the office of the state attorney
general. The attorney general shall have all powers, rights, and duties regarding
violations of this section as are provided in sections 407.010 to 407.145.
✔